Wisconsin, session 2025, AB166.
do enact as follows:AB166,1Section 1. 39.535 of the statutes is created to read:39.535 Reporting data related to student costs and outcomes. (1) Definition. In this section, “institution of higher education” means any of the following:(a) An institution, as defined in s. 36.05 (9), including all branch campuses associated with the institution.(b) A technical college under ch. 38, including all campuses governed by the same technical college district board.(c) A private institution, as defined in s. 39.49 (1) (e).(2) Annual reporting by institutions. (a) An institution of higher education shall collect and, by July 1, 2027, and each July 1 thereafter, report to the board all of the following information relating to its undergraduate degree programs:1. The average salary of the institution’s graduates 6 months after graduation, stated both in the aggregate and segregated by major. In addition, every 5th year, beginning no later than July 1, 2032, the annual report shall include the average salary of the institution's graduates 5 years after graduation, stated both in the aggregate and segregated by major. The institution, to the best of its ability, shall further identify every 5th year, for each major, the percentage of graduates in the major who are employed 5 years after graduation in the field of their major, the average salary of these graduates employed in the field of their major, and the average salary of the graduates not employed in the field of their major.2. The average debt of the institution’s students upon the student’s graduation or discontinuation of studies at the institution for reasons other than transfer, stated both in the aggregate and segregated by major. 3. The institution’s graduation rate, stated both in the aggregate and segregated by major.4. The institution’s annual total cost of attendance and average net cost.5. The financial aid available to the institution’s students.6. The 10 most popular degree programs offered by the institution.(b) To the extent possible, an institution of higher education shall report information under par. (a) using the same methodology that applies to the same or similar information provided by the institution under 20 USC 1091 (a) and 34 CFR 668.41 to 668.45, but the term “major” in par. (a) is not synonymous with the term “field of study.”(c) To the extent information under par. (a) is not required to be provided by an institution of higher education under 20 USC 1091 (a) and 34 CFR 668.41 to 668.45, the institution shall use reasonable methods to collect the information, including gathering the information from alumni surveys or other relevant sources.(d) If an institution of higher education does not have information available for all periods specified in par. (a) 1., the institution shall report the information required under par. (a) 1. for the periods for which information is available.(e) An institution of higher education shall submit reports under this subsection in the form and format prescribed by the board.(3) Board duties. (a) In cooperation with the department of workforce development, the board shall prepare a list of the 50 most in-demand jobs in this state, including the average starting salary and required education level for each job. The board shall make this list publicly available on the board’s website.(b) From the reports received by the board under sub. (2), the board shall incorporate the data into an electronic document formatted in a manner that facilitates comparison of information among institutions of higher education. The board shall annually provide this electronic document, with the list under par. (a), to the department of public instruction.AB166,2Section 2. 115.28 (59) (am) of the statutes is created to read:115.28 (59) (am) Beginning in the 2027-28 school year, annually provide the electronic document received from the higher educational aids board under s. 39.535 (3) (b) to school boards and ensure that every school board provides the electronic document to pupils in grades 10, 11, and 12 in the school district as part of the academic and career planning services required under par. (a). Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab166 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab166 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB166 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB166 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB166: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting